uz_Cyrl_UZ/uz_Cyrl_UZ.aff
# Бирлик,Кўплик қўшимчаси
SFX A Y 861
SFX A 0 лар/HI .		
SFX A 0 ларим/HI .		
SFX A 0 ларинг/HI .		
SFX A 0 лари/HI .		
SFX A 0 ларимиз/HI .		
SFX A 0 ларингиз/HI .		
SFX A 0 ларлари/HI .		
SFX A 0 ларман .		
SFX A 0 ларсан .		
SFX A 0 лармиз .		
SFX A 0 ларсиз .		
SFX A 0 ларлар .		
SFX A 0 ларсизлар .		
SFX A 0 лармасман .		
SFX A 0 лармассан .		
SFX A 0 лармас .		
SFX A 0 лармасмиз .		
SFX A 0 лармассиз .		
SFX A 0 лармаслар .		
SFX A 0 лармассизлар .		
SFX A 0 ларманми .		
SFX A 0 лармисан .		
SFX A 0 ларми .		
SFX A 0 лармизми .		
SFX A 0 лармисиз .		
SFX A 0 лармилар .		
SFX A 0 лармисизлар .		
SFX A 0 лармасманми .		
SFX A 0 лармасмисан .		
SFX A 0 лармасми .		
SFX A 0 лармасмизми .		
SFX A 0 лармасмисиз .		
SFX A 0 лармасмилар .		
SFX A 0 лармасмисизлар .		
SFX A 0 ларманку .		
SFX A 0 ларсанку .		
SFX A 0 ларку .		
SFX A 0 лармизку .		
SFX A 0 ларсизку .		
SFX A 0 ларларку .		
SFX A 0 ларсизларку .		
SFX A 0 лармасманку .		
SFX A 0 лармассанку .		
SFX A 0 лармаску .		
SFX A 0 лармасмизку .		
SFX A 0 лармассизку .		
SFX A 0 лармасларку .		
SFX A 0 лармассизларку .		
SFX A 0 лармиканман .		
SFX A 0 лармикансан .		
SFX A 0 лармикан .		
SFX A 0 лармиканмиз .		
SFX A 0 лармикансиз .		
SFX A 0 лармиканмилар .		
SFX A 0 лармиканмисизлар .		
SFX A 0 лардирман .		
SFX A 0 лардирсан .		
SFX A 0 лардир .		
SFX A 0 лардирмиз .		
SFX A 0 лардирсиз .		
SFX A 0 лардирлар .		
SFX A 0 лардирсизлар .		
SFX A 0 лармасдирман .		
SFX A 0 лармасдирсан .		
SFX A 0 лармасдир .		
SFX A 0 лармасдирмиз .		
SFX A 0 лармасдирсиз .		
SFX A 0 лармасдирлар .		
SFX A 0 лармасдирсизлар .		
SFX A 0 лардирманда .		
SFX A 0 лардирсанда .		
SFX A 0 лардирда .		
SFX A 0 лардирмизда .		
SFX A 0 лардирсизда .		
SFX A 0 лардирларда .		
SFX A 0 лардирсизларда .		
SFX A 0 лармасдирманда .		
SFX A 0 лармасдирсанда .		
SFX A 0 лармасдирда .		
SFX A 0 лармасдирмизда .		
SFX A 0 лармасдирсизда .		
SFX A 0 лармасдирларда .		
SFX A 0 лармасдирсизларда .		
SFX A 0 лармидим .		
SFX A 0 лармидинг .		
SFX A 0 лармиди .		
SFX A 0 лармидик .		
SFX A 0 лармидингиз .		
SFX A 0 лармидилар .		
SFX A 0 лармидингизлар .		
SFX A 0 лармасмидим .		
SFX A 0 лармасмидинг .		
SFX A 0 лармасмиди .		
SFX A 0 лармасмидик .		
SFX A 0 лармасмидингиз .		
SFX A 0 лармасмидилар .		
SFX A 0 лармасмидингизлар .		
SFX A 0 ларманда .		
SFX A 0 ларсанда .		
SFX A 0 ларда .		
SFX A 0 лармизда .		
SFX A 0 ларсизда .		
SFX A 0 ларларда .		
SFX A 0 ларсизларда .		
SFX A 0 лармасманда .		
SFX A 0 лармассанда .		
SFX A 0 лармасда .		
SFX A 0 лармасмизда .		
SFX A 0 лармассизда .		
SFX A 0 лармасларда .		
SFX A 0 лармассизларда .		
SFX A 0 лар-чи .		
SFX A 0 ям .		
SFX A 0 ямман .		
SFX A 0 ямсан .		
SFX A 0 яммиз .		
SFX A 0 ямсиз .		
SFX A 0 ямлар .		
SFX A 0 ямсизлар .		
SFX A 0 яммасман .		
SFX A 0 яммассан .		
SFX A 0 яммас .		
SFX A 0 яммасмиз .		
SFX A 0 яммассиз .		
SFX A 0 яммаслар .		
SFX A 0 яммассизлар .		
SFX A 0 ямманми .		
SFX A 0 яммисан .		
SFX A 0 ямми .		
SFX A 0 яммизми .		
SFX A 0 яммисиз .		
SFX A 0 яммилар .		
SFX A 0 яммисизлар .		
SFX A 0 яммасманми .		
SFX A 0 яммасмисан .		
SFX A 0 яммасми .		
SFX A 0 яммасмизми .		
SFX A 0 яммасмисиз .		
SFX A 0 яммасмилар .		
SFX A 0 яммасмисизлар .		
SFX A 0 ямманку .		
SFX A 0 ямсанку .		
SFX A 0 ямку .		
SFX A 0 яммизку .		
SFX A 0 ямсизку .		
SFX A 0 ямларку .		
SFX A 0 ямсизларку .		
SFX A 0 яммасманку .		
SFX A 0 яммассанку .		
SFX A 0 яммаску .		
SFX A 0 яммасмизку .		
SFX A 0 яммассизку .		
SFX A 0 яммасларку .		
SFX A 0 яммассизларку .		
SFX A 0 яммиканман .		
SFX A 0 яммикансан .		
SFX A 0 яммикан .		
SFX A 0 яммиканмиз .		
SFX A 0 яммикансиз .		
SFX A 0 яммиканмилар .		
SFX A 0 яммиканмисизлар .		
SFX A 0 ямдирман .		
SFX A 0 ямдирсан .		
SFX A 0 ямдир .		
SFX A 0 ямдирмиз .		
SFX A 0 ямдирсиз .		
SFX A 0 ямдирлар .		
SFX A 0 ямдирсизлар .		
SFX A 0 яммасдирман .		
SFX A 0 яммасдирсан .		
SFX A 0 яммасдир .		
SFX A 0 яммасдирмиз .		
SFX A 0 яммасдирсиз .		
SFX A 0 яммасдирлар .		
SFX A 0 яммасдирсизлар .		
SFX A 0 ямдирманда .		
SFX A 0 ямдирсанда .		
SFX A 0 ямдирда .		
SFX A 0 ямдирмизда .		
SFX A 0 ямдирсизда .		
SFX A 0 ямдирларда .		
SFX A 0 ямдирсизларда .		
SFX A 0 яммасдирманда .		
SFX A 0 яммасдирсанда .		
SFX A 0 яммасдирда .		
SFX A 0 яммасдирмизда .		
SFX A 0 яммасдирсизда .		
SFX A 0 яммасдирларда .		
SFX A 0 яммасдирсизларда .		
SFX A 0 яммидим .		
SFX A 0 яммидинг .		
SFX A 0 яммиди .		
SFX A 0 яммидик .		
SFX A 0 яммидингиз .		
SFX A 0 яммидилар .		
SFX A 0 яммидингизлар .		
SFX A 0 яммасмидим .		
SFX A 0 яммасмидинг .		
SFX A 0 яммасмиди .		
SFX A 0 яммасмидик .		
SFX A 0 яммасмидингиз .		
SFX A 0 яммасмидилар .		
SFX A 0 яммасмидингизлар .		
SFX A 0 ямманда .		
SFX A 0 ямсанда .		
SFX A 0 ямда .		
SFX A 0 яммизда .		
SFX A 0 ямсизда .		
SFX A 0 ямларда .		
SFX A 0 ямсизларда .		
SFX A 0 яммасманда .		
SFX A 0 яммассанда .		
SFX A 0 яммасда .		
SFX A 0 яммасмизда .		
SFX A 0 яммассизда .		
SFX A 0 яммасларда .		
SFX A 0 яммассизларда .		
SFX A 0 ям-чи .		
SFX A 0 ли .		
SFX A 0 лиман .		
SFX A 0 лисан .		
SFX A 0 лимиз .		
SFX A 0 лисиз .		
SFX A 0 лилар .		
SFX A 0 лисизлар .		
SFX A 0 лимасман .		
SFX A 0 лимассан .		
SFX A 0 лимас .		
SFX A 0 лимасмиз .		
SFX A 0 лимассиз .		
SFX A 0 лимаслар .		
SFX A 0 лимассизлар .		
SFX A 0 лиманми .		
SFX A 0 лимисан .		
SFX A 0 лими .		
SFX A 0 лимизми .		
SFX A 0 лимисиз .		
SFX A 0 лимилар .		
SFX A 0 лимисизлар .		
SFX A 0 лимасманми .		
SFX A 0 лимасмисан .		
SFX A 0 лимасми .		
SFX A 0 лимасмизми .		
SFX A 0 лимасмисиз .		
SFX A 0 лимасмилар .		
SFX A 0 лимасмисизлар .		
SFX A 0 лиманку .		
SFX A 0 лисанку .		
SFX A 0 лику .		
SFX A 0 лимизку .		
SFX A 0 лисизку .		
SFX A 0 лиларку .		
SFX A 0 лисизларку .		
SFX A 0 лимасманку .		
SFX A 0 лимассанку .		
SFX A 0 лимаску .		
SFX A 0 лимасмизку .		
SFX A 0 лимассизку .		
SFX A 0 лимасларку .		
SFX A 0 лимассизларку .		
SFX A 0 лимиканман .		
SFX A 0 лимикансан .		
SFX A 0 лимикан .		
SFX A 0 лимиканмиз .		
SFX A 0 лимикансиз .		
SFX A 0 лимиканмилар .		
SFX A 0 лимиканмисизлар .		
SFX A 0 лидирман .		
SFX A 0 лидирсан .		
SFX A 0 лидир .		
SFX A 0 лидирмиз .		
SFX A 0 лидирсиз .		
SFX A 0 лидирлар .		
SFX A 0 лидирсизлар .		
SFX A 0 лимасдирман .		
SFX A 0 лимасдирсан .		
SFX A 0 лимасдир .		
SFX A 0 лимасдирмиз .		
SFX A 0 лимасдирсиз .		
SFX A 0 лимасдирлар .		
SFX A 0 лимасдирсизлар .		
SFX A 0 лидирманда .		
SFX A 0 лидирсанда .		
SFX A 0 лидирда .		
SFX A 0 лидирмизда .		
SFX A 0 лидирсизда .		
SFX A 0 лидирларда .		
SFX A 0 лидирсизларда .		
SFX A 0 лимасдирманда .		
SFX A 0 лимасдирсанда .		
SFX A 0 лимасдирда .		
SFX A 0 лимасдирмизда .		
SFX A 0 лимасдирсизда .		
SFX A 0 лимасдирларда .		
SFX A 0 лимасдирсизларда .		
SFX A 0 лимидим .		
SFX A 0 лимидинг .		
SFX A 0 лимиди .		
SFX A 0 лимидик .		
SFX A 0 лимидингиз .		
SFX A 0 лимидилар .		
SFX A 0 лимидингизлар .		
SFX A 0 лимасмидим .		
SFX A 0 лимасмидинг .		
SFX A 0 лимасмиди .		
SFX A 0 лимасмидик .		
SFX A 0 лимасмидингиз .		
SFX A 0 лимасмидилар .		
SFX A 0 лимасмидингизлар .		
SFX A 0 лиманда .		
SFX A 0 лисанда .		
SFX A 0 лида .		
SFX A 0 лимизда .		
SFX A 0 лисизда .		
SFX A 0 лиларда .		
SFX A 0 лисизларда .		
SFX A 0 лимасманда .		
SFX A 0 лимассанда .		
SFX A 0 лимасда .		
SFX A 0 лимасмизда .		
SFX A 0 лимассизда .		
SFX A 0 лимасларда .		
SFX A 0 лимассизларда .		
SFX A 0 ли-чи .		
SFX A 0 дек .		
SFX A 0 декман .		
SFX A 0 дексан .		
SFX A 0 декмиз .		
SFX A 0 дексиз .		
SFX A 0 деклар .		
SFX A 0 дексизлар .		
SFX A 0 декмасман .		
SFX A 0 декмассан .		
SFX A 0 декмас .		
SFX A 0 декмасмиз .		
SFX A 0 декмассиз .		
SFX A 0 декмаслар .		
SFX A 0 декмассизлар .		
SFX A 0 декманми .		
SFX A 0 декмисан .		
SFX A 0 декми .		
SFX A 0 декмизми .		
SFX A 0 декмисиз .		
SFX A 0 декмилар .		
SFX A 0 декмисизлар .		
SFX A 0 декмасманми .		
SFX A 0 декмасмисан .		
SFX A 0 декмасми .		
SFX A 0 декмасмизми .		
SFX A 0 декмасмисиз .		
SFX A 0 декмасмилар .		
SFX A 0 декмасмисизлар .		
SFX A 0 декманку .		
SFX A 0 дексанку .		
SFX A 0 декку .		
SFX A 0 декмизку .		
SFX A 0 дексизку .		
SFX A 0 декларку .		
SFX A 0 дексизларку .		
SFX A 0 декмасманку .		
SFX A 0 декмассанку .		
SFX A 0 декмаску .		
SFX A 0 декмасмизку .		
SFX A 0 декмассизку .		
SFX A 0 декмасларку .		
SFX A 0 декмассизларку .		
SFX A 0 декмиканман .		
SFX A 0 декмикансан .		
SFX A 0 декмикан .		
SFX A 0 декмиканмиз .		
SFX A 0 декмикансиз .		
SFX A 0 декмиканмилар .		
SFX A 0 декмиканмисизлар .		
SFX A 0 декдирман .		
SFX A 0 декдирсан .		
SFX A 0 декдир .		
SFX A 0 декдирмиз .		
SFX A 0 декдирсиз .		
SFX A 0 декдирлар .		
SFX A 0 декдирсизлар .		
SFX A 0 декмасдирман .		
SFX A 0 декмасдирсан .		
SFX A 0 декмасдир .		
SFX A 0 декмасдирмиз .		
SFX A 0 декмасдирсиз .		
SFX A 0 декмасдирлар .		
SFX A 0 декмасдирсизлар .		
SFX A 0 декдирманда .		
SFX A 0 декдирсанда .		
SFX A 0 декдирда .		
SFX A 0 декдирмизда .		
SFX A 0 декдирсизда .		
SFX A 0 декдирларда .		
SFX A 0 декдирсизларда .		
SFX A 0 декмасдирманда .		
SFX A 0 декмасдирсанда .		
SFX A 0 декмасдирда .		
SFX A 0 декмасдирмизда .		
SFX A 0 декмасдирсизда .		
SFX A 0 декмасдирларда .		
SFX A 0 декмасдирсизларда .		
SFX A 0 декмидим .		
SFX A 0 декмидинг .		
SFX A 0 декмиди .		
SFX A 0 декмидик .		
SFX A 0 декмидингиз .		
SFX A 0 декмидилар .		
SFX A 0 декмидингизлар .		
SFX A 0 декмасмидим .		
SFX A 0 декмасмидинг .		
SFX A 0 декмасмиди .		
SFX A 0 декмасмидик .		
SFX A 0 декмасмидингиз .		
SFX A 0 декмасмидилар .		
SFX A 0 декмасмидингизлар .		
SFX A 0 декманда .		
SFX A 0 дександа .		
SFX A 0 декда .		
SFX A 0 декмизда .		
SFX A 0 дексизда .		
SFX A 0 декларда .		
SFX A 0 дексизларда .		
SFX A 0 декмасманда .		
SFX A 0 декмассанда .		
SFX A 0 декмасда .		
SFX A 0 декмасмизда .		
SFX A 0 декмассизда .		
SFX A 0 декмасларда .		
SFX A 0 декмассизларда .		
SFX A 0 дек-чи .		
SFX A 0 симон .		
SFX A 0 симонман .		
SFX A 0 симонсан .		
SFX A 0 симонмиз .		
SFX A 0 симонсиз .		
SFX A 0 симонлар .		
SFX A 0 симонсизлар .		
SFX A 0 симонмасман .		
SFX A 0 симонмассан .		
SFX A 0 симонмас .		
SFX A 0 симонмасмиз .		
SFX A 0 симонмассиз .		
SFX A 0 симонмаслар .		
SFX A 0 симонмассизлар .		
SFX A 0 симонманми .		
SFX A 0 симонмисан .		
SFX A 0 симонми .		
SFX A 0 симонмизми .		
SFX A 0 симонмисиз .		
SFX A 0 симонмилар .		
SFX A 0 симонмисизлар .		
SFX A 0 симонмасманми .		
SFX A 0 симонмасмисан .		
SFX A 0 симонмасми .		
SFX A 0 симонмасмизми .		
SFX A 0 симонмасмисиз .		
SFX A 0 симонмасмилар .		
SFX A 0 симонмасмисизлар .		
SFX A 0 симонманку .		
SFX A 0 симонсанку .		
SFX A 0 симонку .		
SFX A 0 симонмизку .		
SFX A 0 симонсизку .		
SFX A 0 симонларку .		
SFX A 0 симонсизларку .		
SFX A 0 симонмасманку .		
SFX A 0 симонмассанку .		
SFX A 0 симонмаску .		
SFX A 0 симонмасмизку .		
SFX A 0 симонмассизку .		
SFX A 0 симонмасларку .		
SFX A 0 симонмассизларку .		
SFX A 0 симонмиканман .		
SFX A 0 симонмикансан .		
SFX A 0 симонмикан .		
SFX A 0 симонмиканмиз .		
SFX A 0 симонмикансиз .		
SFX A 0 симонмиканмилар .		
SFX A 0 симонмиканмисизлар .		
SFX A 0 симондирман .		
SFX A 0 симондирсан .		
SFX A 0 симондир .		
SFX A 0 симондирмиз .		
SFX A 0 симондирсиз .		
SFX A 0 симондирлар .		
SFX A 0 симондирсизлар .		
SFX A 0 симонмасдирман .		
SFX A 0 симонмасдирсан .		
SFX A 0 симонмасдир .		
SFX A 0 симонмасдирмиз .		
SFX A 0 симонмасдирсиз .		
SFX A 0 симонмасдирлар .		
SFX A 0 симонмасдирсизлар .		
SFX A 0 симондирманда .		
SFX A 0 симондирсанда .		
SFX A 0 симондирда .		
SFX A 0 симондирмизда .		
SFX A 0 симондирсизда .		
SFX A 0 симондирларда .		
SFX A 0 симондирсизларда .		
SFX A 0 симонмасдирманда .		
SFX A 0 симонмасдирсанда .		
SFX A 0 симонмасдирда .		
SFX A 0 симонмасдирмизда .		
SFX A 0 симонмасдирсизда .		
SFX A 0 симонмасдирларда .		
SFX A 0 симонмасдирсизларда .		
SFX A 0 симонмидим .		
SFX A 0 симонмидинг .		
SFX A 0 симонмиди .		
SFX A 0 симонмидик .		
SFX A 0 симонмидингиз .		
SFX A 0 симонмидилар .		
SFX A 0 симонмидингизлар .		
SFX A 0 симонмасмидим .		
SFX A 0 симонмасмидинг .		
SFX A 0 симонмасмиди .		
SFX A 0 симонмасмидик .		
SFX A 0 симонмасмидингиз .		
